Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1091
Nonforfeiture benefits; cash surrender values; certificate loans; other options.

(1) For certificates issued prior to one year after September 6, 1985, the value of every paid-up nonforfeiture benefit and the amount of any cash surrender value, loan, or other option granted shall comply with the provisions of law applicable immediately prior to September 6, 1985.

(2) For certificates issued on or after one year from September 6, 1985, for which reserves are computed on the Commissioner's 1941 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table, the Commissioner's 1941 Standard Industrial Table, the Commissioner's 1958 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table, the Commissioner's 1980 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table, or any more recent table made applicable to life insurers, every paid-up nonforfeiture benefit and the amount of any cash surrender value, loan, or other option granted shall not be less than the corresponding amount ascertained in accordance with the laws of this state applicable to life insurers issuing policies containing like benefits based upon such tables.

Laws 1985, LB 508, § 20.

Mortality tables, see Appendix, Nebraska Revised Statutes, Volume 2A.